lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX 8 Y 116
SFX 8 t   u       [^eîps]t
SFX 8 t   i       [^eîgkps]t
SFX 8 t   0       [^eîps]t
SFX 8 t   am      [^eîps]t
SFX 8 t   at      [^eîps]t
SFX 8 t   iet     [^gkeîps]t
SFX 8 t   ot      [^eîps]t
SFX 8 t   u       [e]pt
SFX 8 t   i       [e]pt
SFX 8 t   0       [e]pt
SFX 8 t   am      [e]pt
SFX 8 t   at      [e]pt
SFX 8 t   iet     [e]pt
SFX 8 t   ot      [e]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûpu     [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûpi     [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûp      [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûpam    [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûpat    [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûpiet   [u]pt
SFX 8 upt   ûpot    [u]pt
SFX 8 t   u       [^açiu]st
SFX 8 t   0       [^açiu]st
SFX 8 t   am      [^açiu]st
SFX 8 t   at      [^açiu]st
SFX 8 t   iet     [^açiu]st
SFX 8 t   ot      [^açiu]st
SFX 8 ast   otu       [a]st
SFX 8 ast   oti       [a]st
SFX 8 ast   ot        [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otam      [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otat      [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otiet     [a]st
SFX 8 ast   otot      [a]st
SFX 8 st   du       [ç]st
SFX 8 st   d        [ç]st
SFX 8 st   dam      [ç]st
SFX 8 st   dat      [ç]st
SFX 8 st   diet     [ç]st
SFX 8 st   dot      [ç]st
SFX 8 st   edu       [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   edi       [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   ed        [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   edam      [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   edat      [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   ediet     [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   edot      [ì]ist
SFX 8 st   etu       [í]ist
SFX 8 st   eti       [í]ist
SFX 8 st   et        [í]ist
SFX 8 st   etam      [í]ist
SFX 8 st   etat      [í]ist
SFX 8 st   etiet     [í]ist
SFX 8 st   etot      [í]ist
SFX 8 ist   îtu       [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   îti       [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   ît        [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   îtam      [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   îtat      [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   îtiet     [n]ist
SFX 8 ist   îtot      [n]ist
SFX 8 st   enu       [r]ist
SFX 8 st   en        [r]ist
SFX 8 st   enam      [r]ist
SFX 8 st   enat      [r]ist
SFX 8 st   eniet     [r]ist
SFX 8 st   enot      [r]ist
SFX 8 ust   ûtu       [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûti       [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ût        [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûtam      [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûtat      [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûtiet     [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûtot      [j]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûstu       [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûsti       [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûst        [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûstam      [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûstat      [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûstiet     [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûstot      [k]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûdu       [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûdi       [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûd        [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûdam      [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûdat      [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûdiet     [z]ust
SFX 8 ust   ûdot      [z]ust
SFX 8 gt  dz       [g]t
SFX 8 gt  dziet    [g]t
SFX 8 kt  c       [k]t
SFX 8 kt  ciet    [k]t
SFX 8 iet  eju      [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ej       [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejam     [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejat     [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejiet    [i]et
SFX 8 iet  ejot     [i]et
SFX 8 ît  inu     [^rvz]ît
SFX 8 ît  in      [^rvz]ît
SFX 8 ît  inam    [^rvz]ît
SFX 8 ît  inat    [^rvz]ît
SFX 8 ît  iniet   [^rvz]ît
SFX 8 ît  inot    [^rvz]ît
SFX 8 ît  iju      [rv]ît
SFX 8 ît  ij       [rv]ît
SFX 8 ît  ijam     [rv]ît
SFX 8 ît  ijat     [rv]ît
SFX 8 ît  ijiet    [rv]ît
SFX 8 ît  ijot     [rv]ît
SFX 8 ît  enu      [d]zît
SFX 8 ît  en       [d]zît
SFX 8 ît  enam     [d]zît
SFX 8 ît  enat     [d]zît
SFX 8 ît  eniet    [d]zît
SFX 8 ît  enot     [d]zît

SFX 6 Y 64
SFX 6   t     ju     [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     0      [bmp]t
SFX 6   t     j      [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jam    [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jat    [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jot    [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jiet  [âçu]t
SFX 6   t     iet   [bmp]t
SFX 6   gt    dzu     [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dz      [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzam    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzat    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzot    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dziet   [g]t
SFX 6   kt    cu     [k]t
SFX 6   kt    c      [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cam    [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cat    [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cot    [k]t
SFX 6   kt    ciet   [k]t
SFX 6   ût    uju     [û]t
SFX 6   ût    uj      [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujam    [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujat    [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujot    [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujiet   [û]t
SFX 6   zt    þu     [z]t
SFX 6   t     0      [z]t
SFX 6   zt    þ      [z]t
SFX 6   zt    þam    [z]t
SFX 6   zt    þat    [z]t
SFX 6   zt    þot    [z]t
SFX 6   st    þu     [s]t
SFX 6   st    d      [s]t
SFX 6   st    þ      [s]t
SFX 6   st    þam    [s]t
SFX 6   st    þat    [s]t
SFX 6   st    þot    [s]t
SFX 6   st    diet   [s]t
SFX 6   t     iet     [lz]t
SFX 6   lt    ïu      [l]t
SFX 6   t     0       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ï       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ïam     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ïat     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ïot     [l]t
SFX 6   t     u      [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     0      [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     am     [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     at     [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     iet    [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     ot     [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   ârt   aru     [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   ar      [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   aram    [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   arat    [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   arot    [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   ariet   [â]rt
SFX 6   çrt   eru    [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   er     [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   eram   [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   erat   [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   erot   [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   eriet  [ç]rt

SFX 2 Y 92
SFX 2   st   þoðs     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoða     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðam    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðu     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðâ     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðas    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðai    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoði     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðiem   [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðus    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðos    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðâm    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðâs    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðais   [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajam  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðo     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajâ   [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajai  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðie    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajiem [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajos  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajâm  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þoðajâs  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þams     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þama     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamam    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamu     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamâ     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamas    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamai    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þami     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamiem   [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamus    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamos    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamâm    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamâs    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamais   [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajam  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamo     [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajâ   [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajai  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamie    [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajiem [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajos  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajâm  [s]t
SFX 2   st   þamajâs  [s]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðs     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoða     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðam    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðu     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðâ     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðas    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðai    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoði     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðiem   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðus    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðos    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðâm    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðâs    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðais   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajam  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðo     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajâ   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajai  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðie    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajiem [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajos  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajâm  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þoðajâs  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þams     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þama     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamam    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamu     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamâ     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamas    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamai    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þami     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamiem   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamus    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamos    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamâm    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamâs    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamais   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajam  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamo     [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajâ   [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajai  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamie    [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajiem [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajos  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajâm  [z]t
SFX 2  zt   þamajâs  [z]t
