lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizbrist/+bEJNI8
aizbrâzt/dB+T42Ie6[]
aizdegt/+9hIB8T(J4d}[]M
aizdiet/M8IBJ
aizdrâzt/+B2IT6ed[4]
aizdzît/9I+B4]J[dM8
aizgraut/B)I+6$5
aizgrauzt/B+2eI64
aizgrûst/+bI2E6
aizkost/+2bIE6
aizmît/B+I459Md[J8]
aizost/I+2Eb6
aizplûkt/M%B5J69I
aizskriet/+IB8J74M
aizspraust/I6+2Eb
aizspurgt/+%95IB6
aizvâkt/+%I9B6d]5[
aizvâzt/I26+eB4
aizíept/J+h(eIB8M4
aizğíiest/I+26bE
aizşmiegt/+%5IB69
apaugt/+9(JBhIM84
apberzt/B42I+e6
apdiet/8IJMB
apdrâzt/+26B[4TIed]
apdîkt/J95I%BM6
apgrauzt/+2e6I4B
apgvelzt/2+Be4I6
apjozt/2dMeI6TB4[]J
apjât/$+1IBb,.6)
apklupt/+eI8BM4J
apkrâpt/+e$)4BI6
aplaist/E2+bI]6[
apmçzt/6+B4Ie2
apnest/+Ie}F8T(hJ]M
aprît/+5J8IB[]dM
apskaust/2+I6
apskaust/EJ2b6I
apspiest/+2IbE6
apspriest/+b2]IE[6
apstiept/e+B4I)6$
apurgt/%+9BI65
apvît/J+8BI[d5M]
apziest/+b6IE2][
apğalkt/+%96BI5
apğïûkt/9+%IM8J
atbelzt/+I2Be64
atblenzt/2+eI4B6
atbrist/J8+bNIE[]
atdrupt/+JeM8BI4
atdûkt/+B9I%65
atgrauzt/+e2IB46
atgvelzt/2Be+6I4
atiezt/2+6eI4B
atjaut/$+I56)B
atkost/I6+b2E
atkust/e+MJIEF8
atkviekt/B+I9%56
atpît/J+M89IB4d[]
atpïaut/BI+$)56
atsnaust/+b26EI
atspiest/+b2E6I][
atsâkt/h+}J](I9TB[dM48
atteikt/I+dB%][965
atvâzt/6+2IBe4
atğalkt/+%I96B5
atğïûkt/9I+%M8J
berzt/2d+B4TIe[]6
bliezt/+d2eB6TI][4
brâzt/e+B2Id[T64]
caurvît/I+JB85M
celt/+BI[6d9M]J5
diet/+I[J]dBM8
grauzt/+e2IdB6T[4
griezt/+e]2Id[B4T6
gvelzt/+e[dI2B6T]4
ieaugt/+8h9M(IBJ4
ieberzt/+2eI6B4
iebâzt/6+eI2B4
iedegt/+h(9IBdT8[4]
iedrâzt/Ie+T2Bd[46]
iedzît/+[9IJB8d4M]
iegrâbt/Ie$Bd4T+[)6]p
iegvelzt/+2BeI64
iekaut/+$)6BI5
iekust/+JeIM8FE
iekârt/+%e]6BdIT[4
ielaist/+2bE[6]I
ienâkt/+}9hdI(8[B5]
iepaust/E+2b6I
ieskriet/+BI7Jd4[8]M
ieslât/+$)BIb61
iespiest/+2b6E][I
iestrçgt/J%9I5B6M
iesviest/+I2bE6
ietçrpt/+)IT4B$e6[dp]
iezîst/6+2IbE
ieçst/J+Ib8E][N
ieğíiest/6+I2
ieòirgt/d+%965IB][
izaugt/hI+(4B89MJ
izbozt/+2ITed]B6[4
izbârt/e+%B6I4
izdegt/(+hI984B
izdzît/9+JBd[4I]M8
izgriezt/2+IdTe]4B6[
izgrûst/+I26Eb
izjozt/Me2I6BJ4
izkniebt/)+eIB6T$d4][p
izkust/+e8IEFJM
izlobt/+$e)IB46
iznâkt/+(hJI9B85M
izpaust/2b+I[6E]
izriet/+IBMJ]8d4[
izrûkt/dB%9+I[5MJ]6
izspiest/b2J6]I[EN
izspurgt/+%5IB96
iztrenkt/+I9%6B5
iztît/JB+Id89M4[]
izziest/+EIb26
izíept/+ehMJI4B(8
izíçrkt/+%9IdB6][5
jozt/IT6+2eBd[]4
klupt/J+e8BIM4
krâkt/+%Id9[J]M6B5
laist/I+6b2E[]
liekt/+9I%d6B[M5]J
liet/+M[Id8B4J]
neapkaut/)6$B
nenoaut/B6
nepadegt/9B8
nesağût/9B6
noblenzt/Ie+24B6
nobçgt/9+(hB8IJ4M
nocelt/+]Id6B[95
nodrupt/B+eIM48J
nodrâzt/+T]eI26[B4d
nogriezt/+2e[ITBd64]
nogvelzt/+2BeI64
nogâzt/6+2BTIde[4]
noklât/Ib+G1B{)[6g$pd&]
nolemt/+)$IB64
noliet/BI+M[d84J]
nomçzt/6eI+B24
nonâkt/+BhJ9I8(M5
nopît/+49J8IB[d]M
noraukt/%I9J6MB5
nosmiet/I[8+4dMBJ]
nosnaust/2I+Eb[6]
nospraust/bE+2I6
nosçkt/+BI69%d[]5
nozvelt/+9BId6][5
nozîst/6+I2E]b[T
noíept/+dMJhBeI4T(8
noğïâkt/+%9B56I
nâkt/+h(J]}I9B85dM[
paberzt/+e26BI4
pabraukt/+d9%B56I][
pabrist/EN+JbI8[]
pabâzt/62+TdIBe4[]
padegt/h+(MJ9ITdB84
padûkt/+9BI%65
pagremzt/M4TBIJ]ed26[
pagâzt/62+TeI]dB4[
paiet/+BIJdM8[]
pajaukt/+BI5%69
pakurt/+(BhI56
palauzt/+IBd2eT64][
palupt/+eI8BJ4M
pamçzt/6+2IeB4
panâkt/h+J](I}9Bd85M[
parît/J+IBd85M[]
pasegt/%+[9d]I5B6
paskaust/+I26E
paspraust/IJE2b6
paspriegt/+9IB%56
patempt/+)6eBI$4
patît/+J9BdI4[8]M
pazelt/+I6B95
pazîst/6+2ETbI][
pağíilt/+I96B5
pağïûkt/9+I8M%J
pieberzt/2+B4Ie6
piedegt/+B8(9JIh4dM[T}]
piedrâzt/26e+Bd]I4T[
piedzît/+9JBdI[84]M
piegrauzt/+I4eB26
piegvelzt/eI2+6B4
piekust/+FJMEIe8
piekviekt/J%IB569M
pielaist/+E2b[6I]
piemît/+9%dI84J5B[M]
pieprast/+BdJI84N
pieskriet/7+BI8MJ4
piesmelt/+96IdB[]5
piesnaust/+2bIE[6]
piesviest/+bI6E2
pievelt/+956]BId[
pievît/]JB+Id[85M
pieğíiest/IJ6b2E
pieğïûkt/%I+J9M8
plât/+Bd$gb&JG)[I1{]M6p
pârart/(8h+IeB4
pârbrâzt/+dITe62[]B4
pârcept/eBI8T+M]J[d}(h4
pârdzît/4I[+J8d9B]M
pârgrauzt/2e+I4B6
pârgâzt/+I2edT[B64]
pârjozt/eIJ2BM46
pârkòupt/B4+IJe8M
pârlauzt/+B264Ie
pârnâkt/h9+IJ(B8M5
pârplûkt/IB+9%J]d56M[
pârsmiet/I+d48MJB[]
pârspriest/+E2Ib6
pârsvçrt/6+T%]e[dIB4
pârğíiest/+2bIE6
pârğíît/BI89+JM4
rît/+JBId85[M]
sabozt/+2IT4Bde6[]
sabçgt/+I9B(hJ84M
sacelt/+9IB[d]65
sadiet/+BI8
sagrauzt/26+eIB4
sagvelzt/+26eB4I
sajust/+BdINJ[8]4
sakraut/+$IB5)6
salaist/2b+I6[E]
saliet/+IM8dBJ4[]
sanâkt/hJ]+d(I}9BM[85
sariest/F+TeI23]
sarûkt/+BI9%6]d[5
saskriet/8M]J+dIB7[4
satriekt/J9d%MI[B56]
savâzt/6+2IBe4
saíept/+hMJeI4B(8
sağïûkt/J96%dIB5M[]
skaust/2Eb+I6
smiet/+8dIJB4[M]
stumt/)+$d[I6B]p
sviest/Eb+I62][
uzaugt/+dBhJ][98}M(TI4
uzbozt/+[2eIdBT6]4
uzbïaut/BI+6)5$
uzdegt/+[hI(9B8TdJ}]4M
uzgrauzt/e+26IB4
uziet/+IB[8JM]
uzjozt/+B2I6e4
uzkurt/+IB(h65
uzkòupt/B48+JIeM
uzmçzt/6+B2eI4
uznâkt/+hI95B(8
uzskriet/M+J74IB8
uzspiest/+I2b]E6[
uzspriegt/+96B%I5
uzvît/J+I[8BdM5]
uzziest/+[EIb26]
vâzt/+2BeIdT4][6
vçzt/+eBI64
vît/+J8BId5[M]
ğíçrst/I+62Eb[]
ğïûkt/+9I%Mh(8J
